New York, session 2025-2026, S4907.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13.17 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) The commissioner shall establish an emergency staffing plan for 4 state operated facilities in each region. Such emergency staffing plan 5 shall include incentivizing the current workforce through enhanced over- 6 time pay, actions to improve staffing that minimize the transfer of 7 individuals from their residences and movement of staff between resi- 8 dences, and enhanced recruitment initiatives. The emergency staffing 9 plan shall be in effect when any region's fill level is less than ninety 10 percent. The emergency staffing plan shall be made publicly available 11 and shall be published on the office's website. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00151-01-5